public/spellcheck/he_TORANIT.aff
PFX a 0 ושמשבכ וו
PFX a 0 ושמשבכ" .
PFX a 0 ושמשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשה וו
PFX a 0 ושמשה" .
PFX a 0 ושמשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכ וו
PFX a 0 ושמשכ" .
PFX a 0 ושמשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכב וו
PFX a 0 ושמשכב" .
PFX a 0 ושמשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשככ וו
PFX a 0 ושמשככ" .
PFX a 0 ושמשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכל וו
PFX a 0 ושמשכל" .
PFX a 0 ושמשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכמ וו
PFX a 0 ושמשכמ" .
PFX a 0 ושמשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשכמה וו
PFX a 0 ושמשכמה" .
PFX a 0 ושמשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשל וו
PFX a 0 ושמשל" .
PFX a 0 ושמשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשלכ וו
PFX a 0 ושמשלכ" .
PFX a 0 ושמשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשמ וו
PFX a 0 ושמשמ" .
PFX a 0 ושמשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשמה וו
PFX a 0 ושמשמה" .
PFX a 0 ושמשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ושמשמכ וו
PFX a 0 ושמשמכ" .
PFX a 0 ושמשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כ וו
PFX a 0 כ" .
PFX a 0 כו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כב [^ו]
PFX a 0 כב וו
PFX a 0 כב" .
PFX a 0 כבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 ככ וו
PFX a 0 ככ" .
PFX a 0 ככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כל [^ו]
PFX a 0 כל וו
PFX a 0 כל" .
PFX a 0 כלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כמ וו
PFX a 0 כמ" .
PFX a 0 כמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 כמה וו
PFX a 0 כמה" .
PFX a 0 כמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כש [^ו]
PFX a 0 כש וו
PFX a 0 כש" .
PFX a 0 כשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשב וו
PFX a 0 כשב" .
PFX a 0 כשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשבכ וו
PFX a 0 כשבכ" .
PFX a 0 כשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשה וו
PFX a 0 כשה" .
PFX a 0 כשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכ וו
PFX a 0 כשכ" .
PFX a 0 כשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכב וו
PFX a 0 כשכב" .
PFX a 0 כשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשככ וו
PFX a 0 כשככ" .
PFX a 0 כשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכל וו
PFX a 0 כשכל" .
PFX a 0 כשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכמ וו
PFX a 0 כשכמ" .
PFX a 0 כשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשכמה וו
PFX a 0 כשכמה" .
PFX a 0 כשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשל וו
PFX a 0 כשל" .
PFX a 0 כשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשלכ וו
PFX a 0 כשלכ" .
PFX a 0 כשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשמ וו
PFX a 0 כשמ" .
PFX a 0 כשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשמה וו
PFX a 0 כשמה" .
PFX a 0 כשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 כשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 כשמכ וו
PFX a 0 כשמכ" .
PFX a 0 כשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ל [^ו]
PFX a 0 ל וו
PFX a 0 ל" .
PFX a 0 לו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכ וו
PFX a 0 לכ" .
PFX a 0 לכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכש [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכש וו
PFX a 0 לכש" .
PFX a 0 לכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשב וו
PFX a 0 לכשב" .
PFX a 0 לכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשבכ וו
PFX a 0 לכשבכ" .
PFX a 0 לכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשה וו
PFX a 0 לכשה" .
PFX a 0 לכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכ וו
PFX a 0 לכשכ" .
PFX a 0 לכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכב וו
PFX a 0 לכשכב" .
PFX a 0 לכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשככ וו
PFX a 0 לכשככ" .
PFX a 0 לכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכל וו
PFX a 0 לכשכל" .
PFX a 0 לכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכמ וו
PFX a 0 לכשכמ" .
PFX a 0 לכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשכמה וו
PFX a 0 לכשכמה" .
PFX a 0 לכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשל וו
PFX a 0 לכשל" .
PFX a 0 לכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשלכ וו
PFX a 0 לכשלכ" .
PFX a 0 לכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשמ וו
PFX a 0 לכשמ" .
PFX a 0 לכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשמה וו
PFX a 0 לכשמה" .
PFX a 0 לכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 לכשמכ וו
PFX a 0 לכשמכ" .
PFX a 0 לכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 מ [^ו]
PFX a 0 מ וו
PFX a 0 מ" .
PFX a 0 מו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 מב [^ו]
PFX a 0 מב וו
PFX a 0 מב" .
PFX a 0 מבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 מה [^ו]
PFX a 0 מה וו
PFX a 0 מה" .
PFX a 0 מהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 מכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 מכ וו
PFX a 0 מכ" .
PFX a 0 מכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 מל [^ו]
PFX a 0 מל וו
PFX a 0 מל" .
PFX a 0 מלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 מש [^ו]
PFX a 0 מש וו
PFX a 0 מש" .
PFX a 0 משו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משב [^ו]
PFX a 0 משב וו
PFX a 0 משב" .
PFX a 0 משבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 משבכ וו
PFX a 0 משבכ" .
PFX a 0 משבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משה [^ו]
PFX a 0 משה וו
PFX a 0 משה" .
PFX a 0 משהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 משכ וו
PFX a 0 משכ" .
PFX a 0 משכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 משכב וו
PFX a 0 משכב" .
PFX a 0 משכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 משככ וו
PFX a 0 משככ" .
PFX a 0 משככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 משכל וו
PFX a 0 משכל" .
PFX a 0 משכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 משכמ וו
PFX a 0 משכמ" .
PFX a 0 משכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 משכמה וו
PFX a 0 משכמה" .
PFX a 0 משכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משל [^ו]
PFX a 0 משל וו
PFX a 0 משל" .
PFX a 0 משלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 משלכ וו
PFX a 0 משלכ" .
PFX a 0 משלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 משמ וו
PFX a 0 משמ" .
PFX a 0 משמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 משמה וו
PFX a 0 משמה" .
PFX a 0 משמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 משמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 משמכ וו
PFX a 0 משמכ" .
PFX a 0 משמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 ש [^ו]
PFX a 0 ש וו
PFX a 0 ש" .
PFX a 0 שו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שב [^ו]
PFX a 0 שב וו
PFX a 0 שב" .
PFX a 0 שבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שבכ וו
PFX a 0 שבכ" .
PFX a 0 שבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שה וו
PFX a 0 שה" .
PFX a 0 שהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכ וו
PFX a 0 שכ" .
PFX a 0 שכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכב וו
PFX a 0 שכב" .
PFX a 0 שכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שככ וו
PFX a 0 שככ" .
PFX a 0 שככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכל וו
PFX a 0 שכל" .
PFX a 0 שכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכמ וו
PFX a 0 שכמ" .
PFX a 0 שכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכמה וו
PFX a 0 שכמה" .
PFX a 0 שכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכש [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכש וו
PFX a 0 שכש" .
PFX a 0 שכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשב וו
PFX a 0 שכשב" .
PFX a 0 שכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשבכ וו
PFX a 0 שכשבכ" .
PFX a 0 שכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשה וו
PFX a 0 שכשה" .
PFX a 0 שכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכ וו
PFX a 0 שכשכ" .
PFX a 0 שכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכב וו
PFX a 0 שכשכב" .
PFX a 0 שכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשככ וו
PFX a 0 שכשככ" .
PFX a 0 שכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכל וו
PFX a 0 שכשכל" .
PFX a 0 שכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכמ וו
PFX a 0 שכשכמ" .
PFX a 0 שכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשכמה וו
PFX a 0 שכשכמה" .
PFX a 0 שכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשל וו
PFX a 0 שכשל" .
PFX a 0 שכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשלכ וו
PFX a 0 שכשלכ" .
PFX a 0 שכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשמ וו
PFX a 0 שכשמ" .
PFX a 0 שכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשמה וו
PFX a 0 שכשמה" .
PFX a 0 שכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שכשמכ וו
PFX a 0 שכשמכ" .
PFX a 0 שכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 של [^ו]
PFX a 0 של וו
PFX a 0 של" .
PFX a 0 שלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכ וו
PFX a 0 שלכ" .
PFX a 0 שלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכש [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכש וו
PFX a 0 שלכש" .
PFX a 0 שלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשב [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשב וו
PFX a 0 שלכשב" .
PFX a 0 שלכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשבכ וו
PFX a 0 שלכשבכ" .
PFX a 0 שלכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשה וו
PFX a 0 שלכשה" .
PFX a 0 שלכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכ וו
PFX a 0 שלכשכ" .
PFX a 0 שלכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכב [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכב וו
PFX a 0 שלכשכב" .
PFX a 0 שלכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשככ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשככ וו
PFX a 0 שלכשככ" .
PFX a 0 שלכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכל [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכל וו
PFX a 0 שלכשכל" .
PFX a 0 שלכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכמ וו
PFX a 0 שלכשכמ" .
PFX a 0 שלכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשכמה וו
PFX a 0 שלכשכמה" .
PFX a 0 שלכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשל [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשל וו
PFX a 0 שלכשל" .
PFX a 0 שלכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשלכ וו
PFX a 0 שלכשלכ" .
PFX a 0 שלכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשמ וו
PFX a 0 שלכשמ" .
PFX a 0 שלכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשמה [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשמה וו
PFX a 0 שלכשמה" .
PFX a 0 שלכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שלכשמכ וו
PFX a 0 שלכשמכ" .
PFX a 0 שלכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a 0 שמ [^ו]
PFX a 0 שמ וו
PFX a 0 שמ" .
PFX a 0 שמו ו[^ו]
